Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB94.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(b) 1. "Conversion therapy" means any practice, treatment, or intervention
that seeks or purports to change an individual's sexual orientation or
gender identity, including efforts to change behaviors or gender
expression or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or
feelings towards individuals of the same gender.
2. "Conversion therapy" does not include any practice, treatment, or
intervention that:
a. Provides acceptance, support, or understanding to an individual,
or facilitates an individual's coping, social support, and identity
exploration and development, if the practice, treatment, or
intervention does not seek to change an individual's sexual
orientation or gender identity;
b. Is neutral with regard to sexual orientation or gender identity;
c. Seeks to prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe
practices; or
d. Assists an individual who is seeking to undergo a gender
transition or is in the process of undergoing a gender transition;
and
(c) "Minor" means an individual under the age of eighteen (18).
(2) The cabinet shall take actions necessary to prohibit the direct or indirect use of
state and federal funds for the practice of conversion therapy on minors,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 10/18/2024 10:35 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 337
referring a minor for conversion therapy, or extending health benefits coverage
for conversion therapy with a minor. This prohibition includes but is not limited
to funding relating to the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program, Medicaid, the
Kentucky Children's Health Insurance Program, child welfare services, and
juvenile justice programs.
(3) Any state agency that discovers or receives a report that a provider who is
certified or licensed to practice in the Commonwealth engages in conversion
therapy efforts with a minor or performs counseling on conversion therapy as
part of his or her training for any profession licensed under a professional
certification or licensing board within the Commonwealth shall report that
provider to the appropriate professional certification or licensing board for
potential disciplinary action.
(4) The cabinet shall update any relevant policies, procedures, standards, manuals,
treatment guidance, and other materials related to child health care, child
welfare, and juvenile justice services to reflect the prohibition established in
subsection (2) of this section and to convey, where appropriate, the risks
associated with the practice of conversion therapy on minors.
(5) All state departments and agencies that regulate, provide, procure, or pay for
medical or mental health services on behalf of Kentucky residents shall explore
actions they may lawfully take to protect minors from the practice of conversion
therapy.
(6) All professional certification or licensing boards, departments, and agencies in
the Commonwealth may explore and implement strategies to prohibit the practice
of conversion therapy on minors and the referral of minors for conversion
therapy including but not limited to making engaging in conversion therapy on
minors or referring minors for conversion therapy unprofessional conduct
subject to disciplinary action.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 10/18/2024 10:35 AM Jacketed